Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 7

Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2015 [Expired]

71-5-701. [Expired.]

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1; repealed by terms of §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 250, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2014; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

Former part 7 §§71-5-701—71-5-706 (Acts 2013, ch. 250, § 1; repealed by terms of former §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2014) concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2013.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 enacted this as a new part 28 to chapter 5 of title 71 but the part has been redesignated as part 7 by authority of the Code Commission.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2016; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-703(b)(3).”

Former part 7, §§71-5-701—71-5-706, concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2015.

71-5-702. [Expired.]

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1; repealed by terms of §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 250, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2014; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

Former part 7 §§71-5-701—71-5-706 (Acts 2013, ch. 250, § 1; repealed by terms of former §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2014) concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2013.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 enacted this as a new part 28 to chapter 5 of title 71 but the part has been redesignated as part 7 by authority of the Code Commission.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2016; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-703(b)(3).”

Former part 7, §§71-5-701—71-5-706, concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2015.

71-5-703. [Expired.]

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1; repealed by terms of §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 250, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2014; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

Former part 7 §§71-5-701—71-5-706 (Acts 2013, ch. 250, § 1; repealed by terms of former §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2014) concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2013.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 enacted this as a new part 28 to chapter 5 of title 71 but the part has been redesignated as part 7 by authority of the Code Commission.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2016; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-703(b)(3).”

Former part 7, §§71-5-701—71-5-706, concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2015.

71-5-704. [Expired.]

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1; repealed by terms of §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 250, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2014; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

Former part 7 §§71-5-701—71-5-706 (Acts 2013, ch. 250, § 1; repealed by terms of former §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2014) concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2013.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 enacted this as a new part 28 to chapter 5 of title 71 but the part has been redesignated as part 7 by authority of the Code Commission.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2016; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-703(b)(3).”

Former part 7, §§71-5-701—71-5-706, concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2015.

71-5-705. [Expired.]

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1; repealed by terms of §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 250, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2014; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

Former part 7 §§71-5-701—71-5-706 (Acts 2013, ch. 250, § 1; repealed by terms of former §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2014) concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2013.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 enacted this as a new part 28 to chapter 5 of title 71 but the part has been redesignated as part 7 by authority of the Code Commission.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2016; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-703(b)(3).”

Former part 7, §§71-5-701—71-5-706, concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2015.

71-5-706. [Expired.]

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1; repealed by terms of §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 250, § 1 provided that title 71, ch. 5, part 7 shall expire on June 30, 2014; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of the part: “(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.”

Former part 7 §§71-5-701—71-5-706 (Acts 2013, ch. 250, § 1; repealed by terms of former §71-5-706, effective June 30, 2014) concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2013.

Acts 2015, ch. 276, § 1 enacted this as a new part 28 to chapter 5 of title 71 but the part has been redesignated as part 7 by authority of the Code Commission.

Former part 7, §§71-5-701—71-5-706, concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2015.